Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.10.170

Hearing—Order—Review or appeal.

(1) The presiding officer shall have sixty days after the hearing to issue an order, including findings of fact and conclusions of law, consistent with RCW 34.05.461(3).

(2) If the director has not delegated his or her authority to a presiding officer to issue a final order, a party may bring a petition for review of the presiding officer's initial order before the director, consistent with RCW 34.05.464.

(3) If the director has previously delegated his or her authority for the presiding officer to issue a final order, then the order of such presiding officer shall be final and may be appealable to the superior court of Washington, consistent with RCW 34.05.514.

(4) The commencement of proceedings for judicial review shall not operate as a stay of any order issued by the director unless specifically ordered by the court.

[ 2019 c 389 s 23.]